Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4808
Blood; who may consent to donate.

Any individual of sound mind and seventeen years of age or more may consent to donate whole blood for the purpose of injecting, transfusing, or transplanting such blood in the human body. No person seventeen or eighteen years of age shall receive compensation for any donation of whole blood without parental permission or authorization.

Laws 1971, LB 799, § 8;

Laws 1972, LB 1086, § 3;

Laws 1977, LB 49, § 1;

Laws 1992, LB 1178, § 9.